Utah statutes.
48-2c-506 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Amendment.

An operating agreement may be altered, amended, or repealed as provided in the operating agreement.  If an operating agreement does not provide for a procedure for altering, amending, or repealing the operating agreement, the operating agreement may be altered, amended, or repealed only by the written consent of all members.

